Nevada, session 83, SB260.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 618 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Administrator shall establish by regulation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
(a) Measures that an employer must take to monitor air quality
and reduce the exposure of an employee to poor air quality from
wildfire smoke where:
(1) The air quality index is 150 or more but less than 200;
and
(2) The air quality index is 200 or more; and
(b) An air quality index level caused by wildfire smoke at
which an employer shall not allow an employee to perform critical
tasks outdoors.
2. Each employer shall establish a communications system in
accordance with the requirements adopted by regulation pursuant
to subsection 3 that:
(a) Informs an employee, in a manner that is understandable
to the employee, when the employee is being exposed to air quality
where the air quality index is 150 or more during the employee’s
shift and of the protective controls that are available to the
employee to reduce exposure to the air quality.
(b) Allows any employee to inform the employer when the
employee is being exposed to air quality where the air quality
index is 150 or more in the employee’s workplace and if the
employee is experiencing any symptom related to such exposure,
including, without limitation, asthmatic attacks, difficulty
breathing or chest pain.
3. The Administrator shall adopt regulations that prescribe:
(a) Requirements for the implementation of a communications
system established pursuant to subsection 2. Such regulations may
prescribe additional requirements for such a communications
system.
(b) Standards for an employer to train employees who work
outdoors and may be exposed to poor air quality from wildfire
smoke. Such standards must require that the training:
(1) Be provided in a manner that is understandable to the
employee;
(2) Describe the requirements imposed on employers
pursuant to this section; and
(3) Describe the risks of not using personal protection
equipment while working outdoors and being exposed to poor air
quality from wildfire smoke.
4. The Administrator may develop and provide to each
employer written guidance for complying with this section and any
regulations adopted pursuant thereto. Such guidance may account
for working conditions in rural and remote locations.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
5. The regulations adopted pursuant to this section must not
impose any additional liability on an employer for the purposes of
industrial insurance or insurance for occupational diseases.
6. The provisions of this section do not apply to any employer
who:
(a) Is an operator of a mine;
(b) Employs commercial truck drivers;
(c) Is a provider of emergency services; or
(d) Has 10 or fewer employees.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Outdoors” means a work environment where an employee
regularly performs job duties in conditions that are directly
affected by the elements. The term does not include a work
environment that is enclosed or climate controlled.
(b) “Provider of emergency services” means an agency of the
State or a political subdivision of the State that provides police,
fire-fighting, rescue, emergency medical services or other services
related to public safety. The term includes, without limitation, any
entity that provides such services during a state of emergency or
declaration of disaster proclaimed pursuant to NRS 414.070.
(c) “Wildfire smoke” means smoke caused by a wildfire which
contains a complex mixture of gases and particles that includes,
without limitation, gases, hazardous air pollutants, water vapor
and particle pollution.
Sec. 2. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 3. 1. This section and section 2 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Section 1 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)